Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TOU GER XIONG MURAL.new text end new text begin $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of St. Paul to design and construct a mural and statue honoring Tou Ger Xiong at Lake Phalen's Tou Ger Xiong Island in St. Paul. new text end